New Jersey, session 222, S4090.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The Legislature finds and declares that: a.  Pancreatic cancer is a serious public health concern in New Jersey and the nation; b.  Pancreatic cancer is a highly aggressive malignancy that arises in the pancreas and is often diagnosed at a late stage when curative treatment is difficult and survival rates are low; c.  Surgery is the only treatment that can cure pancreatic cancer, but is an only option for about 20 percent of cases.  Surgery to remove the cancer, in combination with chemotherapy and possibly radiation therapy, is generally the most effective treatment for early pancreatic cancer; d.  The pancreas is an organ of the digestive and endocrine systems that produces enzymes for digestion and hormones that regulate blood glucose; e.  Symptoms of pancreatic cancer may include weight loss, abdominal discomfort, back pain, and the development of type 2 diabetes.  In some cases, tumors may cause jaundice, which can lead to earlier diagnosis; f.  Pancreatic cancer is currently the third leading cause of cancer-related death in the United States, after lung and colorectal cancers, and is expected to become the second leading cause by 2030; g.  Pancreatic cancer accounts for a disproportionate share of cancer deaths relative to its incidence, reflecting challenges in early detection, disease biology, and access to specialized care; h.  In New Jersey, pancreatic cancer remains a significant burden on patients, families, and the health care system.  According to the New Jersey State Cancer Registry, there are approximately 1,420 new pancreatic cancer diagnoses and 1,191 deaths from pancreatic cancer each year in this State, and the vast majority of cases are diagnosed at an advanced stage, contributing to one of the lowest five-year survival rates among common cancers; i.  Understanding of risk factors, barriers to early detection, access to genetic and biomarker testing, clinical care, clinical trials, and supportive services is critical to improving outcomes for individuals affected by pancreatic cancer; and j.  A coordinated, multidisciplinary approach to pancreatic cancer in New Jersey, coupled with a statewide public awareness campaign on symptoms, risk factors, and early detection, would support evidence-informed policymaking, promote earlier diagnosis, improve access to care, and reduce inequities in health outcomes. 2.    As used in this act: Commissioner means the Commissioner of Health. Department means the Department of Health. Health care provider means a health care facility licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.163 (C.26:2H-1 et seq.) or an individual licensed or certified to practice a health care profession pursuant to Title 45 of the Revised Statutes. Pancreatic cancer means a malignant tumor arising in the pancreas that is frequently diagnosed at an advanced stage. Program means the pancreatic cancer public awareness and education program established pursuant to this act. 3.  The Commissioner of Health, subject to available appropriations, shall establish a pancreatic cancer public awareness and education program. a.     The purpose of the program shall be to promote public awareness of pancreatic cancer and the value of early detection and possible treatments, including the benefits and risks of those treatments.  The Department of Health may accept, for that purpose, any special grant of monies, services, or property from the federal government or any of its agencies, or from any foundation, organization, or medical school. b.  The program shall include the following: (1) Development of a public education and outreach campaign to promote pancreatic cancer awareness and education, including, but not limited to, the following subjects: (a) the cause and nature of pancreatic cancer; (b) diagnostic procedures and appropriate indications for their use; (c) lifestyle issues related to coping with pancreatic cancer, including, but not limited to, nutrition and diet; (d)   lifestyle changes to lower pancreatic cancer risk; and (e)   the availability of pancreatic cancer diagnostic and treatment services in the community. (2)   Development of educational materials to be made available to consumers through local boards of health, physicians, hospitals, community health events, and clinics; (3)   Development of professional education programs for health care providers to assist them in understanding relevant research findings and the subjects set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection; and (4)   Development and maintenance of a list of licensed providers of specialized services for the diagnosis and treatment of pancreatic cancer.  Dissemination of the list shall be accompanied by a description of diagnostic procedures, appropriate indications for their use, and a cautionary statement about the current status of pancreatic cancer research and treatment.  The statement shall also indicate that the department does not endorse specific pancreatic cancer programs or centers in this State. c.  The department, in consultation with the Rutgers Cancer Institute of New Jersey, shall prepare and make available on the departments Internet website, in English and Spanish, and in a manner that is easily understandable by a patient or other non-health care professional, information about the symptoms and treatment of pancreatic cancer and any other information that the commissioner deems to be necessary. This information may be revised by the department whenever new information about pancreatic cancer becomes available. 4.  The Commissioner of Health may adopt rules and regulations, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 5.  This act shall take effect on the 180th day following enactment, except that the Commissioner of Health may take such anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of the act.